Maryland, session 2026, HB1482.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 9–265 of Article – Tax – Property of the Annotated Code of Maryland be
renumbered to be Section(s) 9–112.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1482*

HOUSE BILL 1482
Article – Tax – Property
9–112.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Disabled veteran” means an individual who:
(i) is honorably discharged or released under honorable
[circumstances] CONDITIONS from active military, naval, or air service as defined in 38
U.S.C. § 101; and
(ii) [1. has been declared by the U.S. Department of Veterans
Affairs to have a permanent service–connected disability of at least 50% that results from
blindness or any other disabling cause that:
A. is reasonably certain to continue for the life of the veteran;
and
B. was not caused or incurred by misconduct of the veteran;
or
2.] has been declared by the U.S. Department of Veterans
Affairs to have a PERMANENT OR nonpermanent service–connected disability of [100%]
AT LEAST 20% that results from blindness or any other disabling cause that was not
caused or incurred by misconduct of the veteran.
(3) “Dwelling house”:
(i) means real property that is:
1. the legal residence of a disabled veteran; and
2. occupied by not more than two families; and
(ii) includes the lot or curtilage and structures necessary to use the
real property as a residence.
(b) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of a
county or municipal corporation [may] SHALL grant, by law, a property tax credit under
this section against the county or municipal corporation property tax imposed on a dwelling
house if:
(1) the dwelling house is owned by a disabled veteran;

HOUSE BILL 1482 3
(2) the disabled veteran’s federal adjusted gross income for the
immediately preceding taxable year does not exceed $100,000; and
(3) the application requirements of subsection (d) of this section are met.
(c) The property tax credit granted under this section shall equal:
(1) [50%] 80% of the county or municipal corporation property tax imposed
on the dwelling house if the disabled veteran’s service–connected disability rating is at least
[75%] 70% and the disabled veteran does not qualify for a property tax exemption under §
7–208 of this article; [or]
(2) [25%] 40% of the county or municipal corporation property tax imposed
on the dwelling house if the disabled veteran’s service–connected disability rating is at least
50% but not more than [74%] 69%; OR
(3) 20% OF THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION PROPERTY
TAX IMPOSED ON THE DWELLING HOUSE IF THE DISABLED VETERAN’S
SERVICE–CONNECTED DISABILITY RATING IS AT LEAST 20% BUT NOT MORE THAN
49%.
(d) (1) A disabled veteran shall apply for the property tax credit under this
section by providing to the county or municipal corporation:
(i) a copy of the disabled veteran’s [discharge certificate] DD FORM
214 from active military, naval, or air service; and
(ii) on the form provided by the county or municipal corporation, a
certification of the disabled veteran’s disability from the U.S. Department of Veterans
Affairs.
(2) The disabled veteran’s certificate of disability may not be inspected by
individuals other than:
(i) the disabled veteran; or
(ii) appropriate employees of the county or municipal corporation.
(e) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of a
county or municipal corporation [may] SHALL, by law, continue to provide the property tax
credit under this section to the surviving spouse of the disabled veteran.
(f) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of a
county or municipal corporation may provide, by law, for:
(1) the duration of the tax credit;

HOUSE BILL 1482
(2) regulations and procedures for the application and uniform processing
of requests for the tax credit;
(3) the definition of surviving spouse and the amount and duration of the
tax credit for the surviving spouse; AND
(4) [notwithstanding subsection (a)(2)(ii)2 of this section, eligibility criteria
for the credit allowed under this section that limits the credit to individuals described under
subsection (a)(2)(ii)1 of this section; and
(5)] any other provision necessary to carry out the tax credit under this
section.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.